Florida, session 2026, SB1728.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 33 34 Section 1.âSection 381.9811, Florida Statutes, is created 35 to read: 36 381.9811âLicensure of medical spas.â 37 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the âMedical 38 Spa Prescription Drug Oversight Act.â 39 (2)âFINDINGS AND PURPOSE.â 40 (a)âThe Legislature finds that patients are increasingly 41 turning to medical spas for cosmetic and medical procedures. 42 Many of these medical spas prepare and administer prescription 43 medications intended to be sterile, either compounded or 44 commercially available formulations, with no regulatory 45 oversight by the Board of Pharmacy, which raises significant 46 patient safety concerns. 47 (b)âThe purpose of this section is to license a medical spa 48 that prepares, handles, stores, administers, dispenses, 49 distributes, or otherwise uses prescription medications at the 50 medical spa or in connection with providing services. 51 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 52 (a)ââAdverse eventâ means any untoward medical occurrence 53 associated with the use of a prescription medication, whether or 54 not the event itself is considered prescription medication 55 related. 56 (b)ââBoardâ means the Board of Pharmacy. 57 (c)ââMedical spaâ means any facility or practice that 58 offers medical or health care services and that holds itself out 59 as a facility or practice focused on cosmetic or lifestyle 60 treatments, such as weight loss, wellness, longevity, or 61 cosmetic or aesthetic health care services, including, but not 62 limited to, the preparation, administration, or dispensing of 63 prescription drugs for weight loss; botulinum toxin injections; 64 hormone therapies; or parenteral nutrient therapies. The term 65 does not include a facility or practice that otherwise holds a 66 health care facility license from the state. 67 (d)ââPersonâ means an individual, a corporation, a 68 government, a governmental subdivision or agency, a statutory 69 trust, a business trust, an estate, a trust, a partnership, or 70 an unincorporated association, or one or more of the foregoing 71 having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or 72 commercial entity. 73 (e)ââPrescription medicationâ means any drug, including, 74 but not limited to, finished dosage forms or active ingredients 75 that are subject to, defined in, or described in s. 503(b) of 76 the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act or in s. 465.003, s. 77 499.003(17), s. 499.007(13), or s. 499.82(10). The term includes 78 any biological product, except for blood and blood components 79 intended for transfusion or biological products that are also 80 medical devices. 81 (f)ââResponsible personâ means a licensed health care 82 provider with supervising authority at a medical spa. 83 (g)ââSerious adverse eventâ means an adverse event or 84 suspected adverse reaction that results in death, a life 85 threatening adverse event, inpatient hospitalization or 86 prolongation of existing hospitalization, a persistent or 87 significant incapacity or substantial disruption of the ability 88 to conduct normal life functions, or a congenital anomaly or 89 birth defect. The term includes events that may be considered 90 serious when, based upon appropriate medical judgment, such 91 events may jeopardize the patientâs health and may require 92 medical or surgical intervention to prevent one of the outcomes 93 listed in this paragraph. 94 (h)ââSuspected adverse reactionâ means any adverse event 95 for which there is a reasonable possibility that a prescription 96 medication caused such event. 97 (4)âLICENSURE.â 98 (a)âEach medical spa location that prepares, handles, 99 stores, administers, dispenses, distributes, or otherwise uses 100 prescription medication at its facility or in connection with 101 providing services must obtain and maintain a license from the 102 board. 103 (b)âFailure to obtain a license or comply with any 104 requirements in this section may result in disciplinary action, 105 including, but not limited to, fines, suspension, or revocation 106 of the license. 107 (c)âThe board shall maintain a public database of each 108 medical spa licensed by this state. The database shall include, 109 at a minimum, the name, address, and license number of each 110 medical spa and the name and license number of the responsible 111 person. 112 (5)âPRESCRIPTION MEDICATIONS.â 113 (a)âA licensed medical spa is a dispenser under s. 114 581(3)(A) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 115 U.S.C., and shall comply with the requirements provided in s. 116 582 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. s. 117 360eee-1. 118 (b)âA licensed medical spa may only acquire or receive 119 prescription medication from a person who holds the license, 120 registration, permit, or other authorization required to 121 distribute or otherwise transfer such prescription medication. 122 (c)1.âPrescription medications, and active pharmaceutical 123 ingredients for use in such medications, and devices shall be 124 stored in areas that are dry, well-lit, well-ventilated, and 125 maintained in a clean and orderly condition. Prescription 126 medications shall be stored in accordance with specific storage 127 requirements for controlled substances and medications, 128 consistent with the label and instructions for use of the 129 prescription medication. 130 2.âNoncontrolled prescription medications and hypodermic 131 syringes, needles, and other objects used, intended for use, or 132 designed for use in parenterally injecting controlled substances 133 into the human body shall be maintained under appropriate 134 supervision and control at all times. 135 (d)âA licensed medical spa shall have security controls and 136 procedures to deter and detect the theft and diversion of 137 prescription drugs. The security and control of prescription 138 drugs is the responsibility of both the responsible person and 139 the medical spa. 140 (6)âRESPONSIBLE PERSON.â 141 (a)âEach licensed medical spa shall have a designated 142 responsible person. The board may approve a responsible person 143 to be the responsible person at more than one location. 144 (b)âThe responsible person shall be physically present at 145 the medical spa location for a sufficient amount of time to 146 perform his or her responsibilities. 147 (c)âThe responsible person must ensure the medical spa is 148 in compliance with this section. 149 (7)âINSPECTIONS.âSubmission of an application for a license 150 by a medical spa constitutes permission for entry and onsite 151 inspection by the board or a third party approved by the board. 152 Such inspection must occur in connection with initial licensure 153 and as determined by the board. Refusal to allow the board or 154 third party access to conduct an inspection is a violation of 155 this section. 156 (8)âADVERSE INCIDENTS.â 157 (a)âA licensed medical spa shall notify the board within 5 158 business days after the occurrence of a serious adverse event. 159 (b)âThe notice shall include, to the extent such 160 information is obtained by or reasonably available to the 161 medical spa from any source, the date, the nature, and the 162 location of the adverse event and medical spa records of 163 patients directly affected by the serious adverse event. 164 (9)âDECEPTIVE AND UNFAIR TRADE PRACTICES.âA licensed 165 medical spa engages in deceptive and unfair trade practices, in 166 violation of the Florida Deceptive and Unfair Trade Practices 167 Act, when, in the course of business, the medical spa 168 misrepresents a prescription medication as having: 169 (a)âA particular standard, quality, or grade; 170 (b)âSponsorship, approval, characteristics, ingredients, 171 uses, or benefits; 172 (c)âA function similar to a drug approved by the federal 173 Food and Drug Administration; or 174 (d)âApproval from the federal Food and Drug Administration. 175 (10)âINVESTIGATIONS AND PENALTIES.â 176 (a)âThe board shall enforce this section, including actions 177 for which a license is required under this section when a 178 medical spa has failed to obtain a license. If the board has or 179 receives information that any provision of this section has been 180 violated, the board shall investigate and take appropriate 181 action. 182 (b)âViolations include, but are not limited to, all of the 183 following: 184 1.âViolations of the practice of pharmacy as provided under 185 chapter 465; 186 2.âViolations of any rule or regulation of the board; 187 3.âViolations that pose a threat to the public health, as 188 determined by the board; 189 4.âEngaging or attempting to engage in the possession, 190 sale, or distribution of controlled substances as set forth in 191 chapter 893, for any other than legitimate purposes authorized 192 by this section; or 193 5.âViolations of any provision of the Federal Food, Drug, 194 and Cosmetic Act, 52 Stat. 1040 (1938), 21 U.S.C. ss. 301 et 195 seq. or 21 U.S.C. ss. 801-971. 196 (c)âThe board shall maintain a public record of 197 disciplinary actions involving medical spas, subject to 198 transparency and confidentiality laws. 199 (11)âRULES.âThe board shall adopt rules to implement this 200 section within 6 months after this section takes effect. 201 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.